Montana, session 2025, SB273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 45-5-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"45-5-201. Assault. (1) A person commits the offense of assault if the person:
(a) purposely or knowingly causes bodily injury to another;
(b) negligently causes bodily injury to another with a weapon;
(c) purposely or knowingly makes physical contact of an insulting or provoking nature with any
individual;
(d) purposely or knowingly causes reasonable apprehension of bodily injury in another; or
(e) purposely or knowingly provides an individual with rohypnol, flunitrazolam, or gamma-
hydroxybutyrate without the individual's consent.
(2) A person convicted of assault shall be fined not to exceed $500 or be imprisoned in the county
jail for any term not to exceed 6 months, or both.
(3) Except when the victim is developmentally disabled, physically disabled, or suffers from a
mental illness causing them to be physically or mentally disabled, the victim of an assault has the sole
responsibility of determining whether or not a charge alleging a violation of this section is filed."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 273